New Jersey, session 222, S2276.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Prior to commencing an institutional merger or consolidation, including a merger or consolidation of one or more schools within the same institution, the governing board of a public institution of higher education shall notify the Secretary of Higher Education of the proposed merger or consolidation. b.  The notice required pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall include, at a minimum: (1) the reason for the proposed merger or consolidation; (2) the projected cost of the proposed merger or consolidation and a preliminary assessment of any fiscal impacts; and (3) the effect on the students and employees of the institutions and schools. c.  The notice shall be provided to the secretary within 14 days of the date upon which the governing board adopts a resolution, or otherwise enters into an agreement, to commence an institutional merger or consolidation. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.